California statutes. Financial Code
CHAPTER 3. Licensing: Residential Mortgage Loan Servicer [50130. - 50130.]

50130.

(a) A mortgage servicer shall file an application for licensure under this chapter with the commissioner to service mortgage loans in this state by satisfying the requirements of this chapter and the applicable provisions, as determined by the commissioner, of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50120).

(b) A mortgage servicer may apply for
 licensure by doing all of the following:

(1) Filing with the commissioner an application containing the information required by Section 50122, and any additional information the commissioner may require by rule.

(2) Paying the investigation and application fees required by Section 50121.

(3) Submitting any information required by Section 50124.

(4) Complying with the applicable provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50120).

(c) A licensee may not make or service loans secured by real property pursuant to the authority of a license, or exemption from licensure, under the Real Estate Law.

(d) The commissioner may,
 pursuant to Section 50321, order a licensee to cease any other business conducted at any location where the licensee operates under the authority of a residential mortgage servicer license, if the commissioner finds that the conduct of that business has facilitated evasions of this division or the rules adopted pursuant to this division, or that the conduct of that business is in violation of any law to which that business is subject.

(e) A license for a business location outside this state shall constitute an agreement by the mortgage servicer to, at the discretion of the commissioner, either (1) make the licensee’s books, accounts, papers, records, and files available to the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives in this state within 10 calendar days of a request from the commissioner or, (2) pay the reasonable expenses for travel, meals, and lodging of the commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives incurred during an
 investigation or examination made at the licensee’s location outside this state.

(f) The commissioner shall license a mortgage servicer upon completion of the investigation and issuance of the findings required by Section 50121, subject to Sections 50123, 50125, 50126, and 50127.

(g) A mortgage servicer licensed to service mortgage loans shall comply with all applicable requirements of California and federal law, including the Civil Code and Section 2609 of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(h) A license shall remain in effect until suspended, surrendered, or revoked.

(i) The commissioner may require an applicant or licensee to make some or all filings with the commissioner through the
 Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 59.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Mortgage Loan Originators [50140. - 50146.]

50140.

(a) An applicant for a license as a mortgage loan originator shall apply by submitting the uniform form prescribed for that purpose by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The commissioner may require the submission of additional information or supporting documentation to the department.

(b) Section 461 of the Business and Professions Code shall not be applicable to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation when using a national uniform application adopted or approved for use by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in connection with the SAFE Act.

(c) The commissioner shall, by rule, establish the timelines, fees, and assessments applicable to applicants
 for original mortgage loan originator licenses, license renewals, and license changes under this division.

(d) The commissioner may, by rule, require mortgage loan originator licensees to pay assessments through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(e) In connection with an application for a license as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including the following:

(1) Fingerprint images and related information, for purposes of performing a federal, or both a state and federal, criminal history background check.

(2) Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Mortgage
 Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain both of the following:

(A) An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency.

(B) Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

(f) The commissioner may ask the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to obtain state criminal history background check information on applicants described in subdivision (a) using the procedures set forth in subdivisions (g) and (h).

(g) If the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry electronically submits fingerprint images and related information, as required by
 the Department of Justice, for an applicant for a mortgage loan originator license, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state convictions and state arrests and to the existence and content of a record of state arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal, the Department of Justice shall provide an electronic response to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and shall provide the same electronic response to the commissioner.

(h) The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a). The Department of Justice shall provide the
 same electronic response to the commissioner.

(i) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the requests described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 159.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50141.

(a) The commissioner shall deny an application for a mortgage loan originator license unless the commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings:

(1) The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation or set aside of such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation.

(2) (A) The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration, or at any time preceding the date of
 application, if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering. Whether a particular crime is classified as a felony shall be determined by the law of the jurisdiction in which an individual is convicted.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, an expunged or pardoned felony conviction shall not require denial of an application. However, the commissioner may consider the underlying crime, facts, or circumstances of an expunged or pardoned felony conviction when determining the eligibility of an applicant for licensure under this paragraph or paragraph (3).

(3) The applicant has demonstrated such financial responsibility, character, and general fitness as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this
 division.

(4) The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in Section 50142.

(5) The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirements described in Section 50143.

(6) The applicant is employed by, and subject to the supervision of, a residential mortgage lender or servicer that has obtained a license from the commissioner pursuant to this division.

(7) The surety bond of the residential mortgage lender or servicer employing the applicant covers the activities of the applicant and meets the requirements of Section 50205.

(b) Before denying a license under this section, the commissioner shall proceed as prescribed by Chapter 5 (commencing
 with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall have all the powers granted under that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 444, Sec. 4.   (SB 217)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

50142.

(a) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator license shall complete at least 20 hours of education approved in accordance with subdivision (b). The education shall include at least the following:

(1) Three hours of instruction on federal law and regulations.

(2) Three hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues.

(3) Two hours of training related to lending standards for the
 nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(4) Two hours of training related to relevant California law and regulations.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), prelicensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity that is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or
 entity.

(d) Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(e) The prelicensing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for any state other than California shall be accepted as credit toward completion of prelicensing education requirements in California.

(f) An individual previously licensed under this chapter applying to be licensed again must prove that he or she has completed all of the continuing education requirements for the year in which that individual last held the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 123, Sec. 4.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50143.

(a) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator license shall pass a qualified written test developed or otherwise deemed acceptable by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and administered by a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(b) A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of subdivision (a) unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate
 subject areas, including the following:

(1) Ethics.

(2) Federal law and regulation relating to mortgage origination.

(3) State law and regulation relating to mortgage origination.

(4) Federal and state law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair lending issues.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant or the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant,
 or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

(d) (1) An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than 75 percent of correct answers to questions.

(2) An individual who fails the qualified written test may retake the test up to three consecutive times, although at least 30 days shall pass between each retesting.

(3) An applicant who fails three consecutive retests shall wait at least six months before retesting.

(4) A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to
 maintain a valid license for a period of five years or longer shall retake the test, not taking into account any time during which the individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 123, Sec. 5.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50144.

(a) A mortgage loan originator shall comply with the requirements of this section on or before December 31 of every year.

(b) The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include the following:

(1) The mortgage loan originator continues to meet
 the minimum standards for license issuance under Section 50141.

(2) The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in Section 50145.

(3) The mortgage loan originator, or the residential mortgage lender or servicer employing the mortgage loan originator, has paid all required fees for renewal of the license.

(4) The license of a mortgage loan originator failing to satisfy the minimum standards for license renewal shall expire at midnight on December 31, except as provided in Section 50145. The commissioner may adopt procedures for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 287, Sec. 13.   (SB 1137)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

50145.

(a) A licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight hours of continuing education approved in accordance with subdivision (b). The continuing education shall include at least the following:

(1) Three hours of instruction on federal law and regulations.

(2) Two hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues.

(3) Two hours of training related to lending standards for the
 nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(4) One hour of training related to relevant California law and regulations.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity that is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the
 employer or entity.

(d) Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (i), a licensed mortgage loan originator:

(1) May only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken.

(2) May not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

(f) A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an approved instructor of an approved continuing education
 course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours credit for every one hour taught.

(g) A person who has successfully completed continuing education requirements approved by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for any state other than California shall be granted credit toward completion of continuing education requirements in California.

(h) A licensed mortgage loan originator who subsequently becomes unlicensed shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license.

(i) A person meeting the requirements of
 paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 50144 may correct any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule or regulation of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 123, Sec. 6.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

50146.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner shall require mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this requirement the commissioner is authorized to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the commissioner may establish by rule, regulation,
 or order, requirements as necessary, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Background checks for:

(1) Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases.

(2) Civil or administrative records.

(3) Credit history.

(4) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or the commissioner.

(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew licenses through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(c) The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates.

(d) Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other activities as the commissioner deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 60.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.6. Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry [50150. - 50152.]

50150.

(a) The commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this division.

(b) For the purpose of participating in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, the commissioner is authorized to waive or modify, in whole or in part, by rule, regulation, or order, any or all of the requirements of this division and to establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(c) The commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from, and distributing information to, the Department of Justice or any governmental agency.

(d) The commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the commissioner.

(e) The
 commissioner shall establish a process where applicants and licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 61.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50151.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1512 of the SAFE Act, the requirements under any federal law or the Information Practices Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state
 law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to that information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or the Information Practices Act.

(b) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the following:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the state.

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to the information or material, the person to whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of that person, that privilege.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 61.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50152.

The commissioner shall report regularly violations of this division, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, to the extent that information is public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 61.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Financial Condition, Transaction and Bond Requirements [50200. - 50209.]

50200.

(a) At the end of the licensee’s fiscal year, but in no case more than 12 months after the last audit conducted pursuant to this section, each licensed residential mortgage lender or servicer shall cause its books and accounts to be audited by an independent certified public accountant. Beginning with all audits of business conducted after December 31, 1995, the audit shall be sufficiently comprehensive in scope to permit the expression of an opinion on the financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and shall be performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The audit shall include a reconciliation of the licensee’s trust accounts as of the audit date.

(b) “Expression of an opinion” includes (1) an
 unqualified opinion, (2) a qualified opinion, (3) a disclaimer of opinion, or (4) an adverse opinion. If a financial statement, report, certificate, or opinion of the independent certified public accountant is in any way qualified, the commissioner may require the licensee to take any action that the commissioner deems appropriate to address the qualification. The commissioner may reject any financial statement, report, certificate, or opinion by notifying the licensee or other person required to make the filing of the rejection and the reason therefor. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the licensee or other person shall correct the deficiencies. Failure to correct the deficiencies is a violation of this division. The commissioner shall retain a copy of all financial statements, reports, certificates, or opinions so rejected.

(c) If a qualified or adverse opinion is expressed or if an opinion is disclaimed, the reasons therefor
 must be fully explained.

(d) The audit report shall be filed with the commissioner within 105 days of the end of the licensee’s fiscal year. The report filed with the commissioner shall be certified by the certified public accountant conducting the audit. The commissioner may promulgate rules regarding late audit reports.

(e) If a licensee required to make an audit fails to cause an audit to be made, the commissioner may cause the audit to be made by an independent certified public accountant at the licensee’s expense. The commissioner shall select the independent certified public accountant by advertising for bids or by other fair and impartial means that the commissioner establishes by rule. The commissioner may summarily revoke the license of a licensee who fails to file a certified financial statement prepared by an independent certified public accountant as required by this
 division or at the request of the commissioner. If, after a revocation order is made, the request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days from the date of service of the order and a hearing is not held within 90 days of the filing, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During a period when its license is revoked, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by further order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.

(f) Audits conducted in accordance with the uniform single audit procedures of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development may be submitted in fulfillment of the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 356, Sec. 2.   (SB 1201)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

50201.

(a) A licensee issued a license for purposes of making or servicing residential mortgage loans, including a licensee employing one or more mortgage loan originators, shall continuously maintain a minimum tangible net worth at all times of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The commissioner, in his or her discretion, may require a lender who engages in the activities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 50003 to continuously maintain a minimum tangible net worth of an amount that is greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), but that does not exceed the net worth required of an approved lender under the Federal Housing Administration.

(b) Tangible net worth shall be computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(c) The commissioner may promulgate rules or regulations with respect to the requirements for minimum net worth, as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this division and comply with the SAFE Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.   (SB 657)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

50202.

(a) Escrow funds for a purpose authorized by the residential mortgage loan contract (1) shall be subject to and satisfy all applicable state and federal requirements, including Section 2609 of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.) and all applicable provisions of the Civil Code, (2) shall be maintained in a depository institution as described in subdivision (b), and (3) may not be commingled with a licensee’s funds.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (f), or as authorized by Section 2954.85 of the Civil Code, a trust account shall be placed in a non-interest-bearing account in a federally
 insured depository institution, a federal home loan bank, a federal reserve bank, or other similar government-sponsored enterprise, to be removed and used only for the following:

(1) Payments authorized by the borrower, allowed by the mortgage loan contract, or required by federal or state law.

(2) Refunds to the borrower.

(3) Transfer to another institution that is described in this subdivision.

(4) Forwarding to the appropriate servicer in case of a transfer of servicing.

(5) Any other purpose authorized by the residential mortgage loan contract.

(6) Compliance with a regulatory or court order.

(c) As used in this section, “trust funds” means funds collected by a licensee in connection with the making or servicing of a residential mortgage loan that the licensee holds on behalf of another.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to the limitations of Section 854, benefits accruing from the placement in a non-interest-bearing account of a commercial bank (including a national banking association) of funds received by a licensee who services mortgage loans under this law, shall inure to the licensee, unless otherwise agreed in writing by the licensee and the investor on whose behalf the licensee services the loan. A borrower shall receive at least 2 percent simple interest per annum on impound account payments covered by Section 2954.8 of the Civil Code.

(e) Trust funds are not subject to the
 enforcement of a money judgment arising out of a claim against the licensee or person acting as the servicing agent, and in no instance shall the trust funds be considered or treated as an asset of the licensee or person performing the functions of a residential mortgage lender or loan servicer.

(f) A licensee may, at the request of the owner of the trust funds, transfer the funds initially deposited in a non-interest-bearing trust account into an interest-bearing account in a federally insured depository institution if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The account is in the name of the residential mortgage lender licensee in trust for the specified beneficiary.

(2) All of the funds in the account are federally insured.

(3) The funds in the
 account are kept separate and distinct from the funds of the licensee or funds of any other person for whom the licensee holds funds in trust.

(4) The licensee discloses to the person from whom the funds are received and the beneficiary of the account how interest will be calculated and paid, whether service charges will be paid to the depository and by whom, and possible notice requirements or penalties for withdrawal of funds from the account.

(5) All interest earned on the account will be paid to the owner of the trust funds or the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 103, Sec. 2.   (AB 493)   Effective August 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

50203.

(a) A licensee may not require a borrower to pay fees or charges prior to the residential mortgage loan closing, except for:

(1) Actual charges to be incurred by the licensee on behalf of the borrower for services from third parties necessary to process the application, such as credit reports, appraisals, flood certification, and tax service, and in transactions where these
 services are provided by the licensee, a charge not to exceed the prevailing market rate for the service.

(2) An application fee.

(3) A rate-lock fee, provided:

(A) There is a written agreement signed by the borrower and licensee.

(B) The terms of the agreement include, but are not limited to:

(i) The expiration date of the rate-lock fee agreement.

(ii) The principal amount of the mortgage loan, the term of the mortgage loan, and identification of the property.

(iii) The initial interest rate and the discount (points) to be paid.

(iv) The amount and payment term of the rate-lock fee along with a statement disclosing whether the fee is refundable and the terms and conditions necessary to obtain a refund.

(C) The licensee demonstrates to the commissioner that it is able to perform under the terms of the agreement.

(4) A commitment fee, upon approval of the residential mortgage loan application, provided:

(A) The commitment is in writing and signed by the licensee and the borrower.

(B) The commitment contains all of the following information:

(i) The terms and conditions of the residential mortgage loan.

(ii) The terms and conditions of the commitment, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(I) The time period during which the commitment is irrevocable and may be accepted by the borrower, which may not be less than three calendar days from the date of commitment or the date of mailing, whichever is later.

(II) The amount and payment terms of the commitment fee, along with a statement disclosing whether the fee is refundable and the terms and conditions necessary to obtain a refund.

(III) The expiration date of the commitment.

(IV) Conditions precedent to closing.

(b) If the licensee has performed its obligations under the law related to the transaction, fees or
 charges collected pursuant to this section, other than those collected pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), shall be refunded if a valid commitment or closing, respectively, does not occur, except that the licensee may retain appropriate fees upon the licensee’s demonstration to the commissioner that any of the following occurred:

(1) The borrower withdrew the loan application.

(2) The borrower made a material misrepresentation or omission on the loan application.

(3) The borrower failed, after written request, to provide documentation necessary to the processing or closing of the loan application.

(4) The closing failed to occur due solely to the fault of the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 564, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

50204.

A licensee may not do any of the following:

(a) Disburse the mortgage loan proceeds in a form other than direct deposit to the borrower’s or borrower’s designee’s account, wire, bank or certified check, ACH funds transfer, or attorney’s check drawn on a trust account. An entity may apply to the commissioner for a waiver of the requirements of this subdivision by
 demonstrating, in a letter application, that it has adopted or will adopt another method of disbursement of loan proceeds that will satisfy the purposes of this subdivision.

(b) Fail to disburse funds in accordance with a commitment to make a mortgage loan that is accepted by the applicant.

(c) Accept fees at closing that are not disclosed to the borrower on the federal HUD-1 Settlement Statement.

(d) Commit an act in violation of Section 2941 of the Civil Code.

(e) Obtain or induce an agreement or other instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution.

(f) Intentionally delay closing of a mortgage loan for the sole purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees, or charges
 payable by the borrower.

(g) Engage in fraudulent home mortgage underwriting practices.

(h) Make payment of any kind, whether directly or indirectly, to an in-house or fee appraiser of a government or private money lending agency, with which an application for a home mortgage has been filed, for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of real estate that is to be covered by the home mortgage.

(i) Engage in any acts in violation of Section 17200 or 17500 of the Business and Professions Code.

(j) Knowingly misrepresent, circumvent, or conceal, through subterfuge or device, any material aspect or information regarding a transaction to which it is a party.

(k) Do an act, whether of the same or a different character than specified in this section, that constitutes fraud or dishonest dealings.

(l) Sell more than eight loans in a calendar year made under the authority of this license to a person who is not an institutional investor.

(m) Commit an act in violation of Section 1695.13 of the Civil Code.

(n) Make or service a loan that is not a residential mortgage loan under the authority of the license.

(o) Commit an act in violation of Section 2948.5 of the Civil Code. Evidence of compliance with Section 2948.5 of the Civil Code may be evidenced by (1) a certification executed by the licensee, at no cost to the borrower, pursuant to Section 2015.5 of
 the Code of Civil Procedure, or (2) other evidence in the loan file acceptable to the commissioner.

(p) Make or broker a loan that is offered by, negotiated by, or applied for through a mortgage loan originator who is not licensed in this state through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, unless the mortgage loan originator is exempt from licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 65.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50205.

(a) A residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee shall maintain a surety bond in accordance with this subdivision. The bond shall be used for the recovery of expenses, fines, and fees levied by the commissioner in accordance with this division or for losses or damages incurred by borrowers or consumers as the result of a licensee’s noncompliance with the requirements of this division. The bond shall
 be payable when the licensee fails to comply with a provision of this division and shall be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and may be increased by order of the commissioner to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) upon a determination by the commissioner that the licensee is not in compliance with any provision of this chapter or any rule or order adopted or issued by the commissioner to implement or enforce provisions of this chapter. The bond shall be payable to the commissioner and issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state. An original surety bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be filed with the commissioner within 10 days of its execution.

(b) When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon the recovery of an action on the bond, the licensee
 shall file a new bond. Failure to file a new bond within 10 days of the recovery on a bond, or within 10 days after notification by the commissioner that a new bond is required, constitutes sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license.

(c) The commissioner may by rule require a higher bond amount for a licensee employing one or more mortgage loan originators, based on the dollar amount of residential mortgage loans originated by that licensee and any mortgage loan originators employed by that licensee. Every mortgage loan originator employed by the licensee shall be covered by the surety bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 66.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50206.

(a) Prior to a change of control of the business of a licensee, the person wishing to acquire control shall submit an application to the commissioner and pay an investigation fee of one hundred dollars ($100). The application shall contain the information that the commissioner, by rule, may prescribe as necessary to determine that the person meets the requirements of Section 50121.

(b) The commissioner shall approve or disapprove the proposed change of control of a licensee in accordance with the provisions of Section 50126.

(c) Upon notification by the commissioner that the change of control has been disapproved, the acquiring party shall immediately cease any activity subject to regulation under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 67.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------
